Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB345.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2.2(b) of the act of April 8, 1982 (P.L.310, No.87), referred to as the Recorder of Deeds Fee Law, is amended to read:Section 2.2. * * *(b) [In] (1) Except as provided in paragraphs (3) and (4), in addition to the fees charged by a recorder of deeds or an equivalent officer in a county, the governing body of the county may, by resolution or ordinance, authorize the recorder of deeds to charge and collect a fee not to exceed [$15] $16 for each deed and mortgage recorded.(2) Beginning one year after the effective date of this 123456789101112131415161718192021 paragraph and annually thereafter, the Department of Community and Economic Development shall calculate an increase in the fee amount under paragraph (1) at the rate of inflation as outlined in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers for the Philadelphia-Camden-Wilmington, PA-NJ-DE-MD area for the most recent 12-month period for which the figures have been reported by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics, rounded to the nearest dollar. The Department of Community and Economic Development shall transmit notice of the following to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin:(i) If the rate of inflation increases, the increased fee amount.(ii) If the rate of inflation does not increase, that the fee amount will remain the same as it was for the previous year.(3) The governing body of a county may increase the fee each year to the published increased fee amount under paragraph (2)(i) and by ordinance or resolution authorize the recorder of deeds to charge and collect the increased fee.(4) If the governing body of a county does not increase the fee in a year or years under paragraph (3) and subsequently chooses to do so, the governing body may increase the fee to the most recently published increased fee amount under paragraph (2)(i) and by ordinance or resolution authorize the recorder of deeds to charge and collect the increased fee.(5) The fee shall be deposited into the county demolition fund to be used exclusively for the demolition of 20250SB0345PN0282 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 blighted property situate in the county.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0345PN0282 - 3 - 123